Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.220

Violations—Cease and desist orders—Notice—Injunctions.

(1) If the board determines following notice and hearing, or following notice if no hearing was timely requested, that a person has:

(a) Violated any provisions of this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW; or

(b) Violated any lawful order, or rule of the board

an order may be issued by the board requiring the person to cease and desist from the unlawful practice. The board shall then take affirmative action as is necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(2) If the board makes a written finding of fact that the public interest will be irreparably harmed by delay in issuing an order, a temporary cease and desist order may be issued. Prior to issuing a temporary cease and desist order, the board, whenever possible, shall give notice by telephone or otherwise of the proposal to issue a temporary cease and desist order to the person to whom the order would be directed. Every temporary cease and desist order shall include in its terms a provision that upon request a hearing will be held to determine whether the order becomes permanent.

(3) The department, with or without prior administrative proceedings, may bring an action in the superior court to enjoin the acts or practices and to enforce compliance with this chapter, or rule or order under this chapter. Upon proper showing, injunctive relief or temporary restraining orders shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed. The department shall not be required to post a bond in any court proceedings.

[ 1993 c 313 s 10; 1987 c 150 s 25; 1983 c 39 s 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.